Utah statutes.
78B-1-145.   Witnesses -- Variance in form of swearing to suit beliefs.
(1)  Whenever the court before which a person is offered as a witness is
satisfied that the person has a peculiar mode of swearing, connected with or
in addition to the usual form, which in the person's opinion is more solemn or
obligatory, the court may in its discretion adopt that mode.
(2)  A person who believes in a religion other than the Christian religion may
be sworn according to the particular ceremonies of the person's religion, if
there are any.
